Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1704
Misdemeanors; recognizance; return.

The sheriff or other officer shall return such writ according to the command thereof, with the name of the surety or sureties, together with the recognizance taken as aforesaid; and the recognizance so taken and returned shall be filed and recorded by the clerk of the court to which the same was returned, and may be proceeded on in the same way as if such recognizance had been taken in the court during term time.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 429, p. 820;

R.S.1913, § 9073;

C.S.1922, § 10097;

C.S.1929, § 29-1704;

R.S.1943, § 29-1704.